Louisiana, session 2026, HB89.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 16:117 and 694 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§117. Group health insurance; Third Judicial District; office of the district attorney;
eligible retired employees
A. The premium costs of group health insurance shall be paid in full from
the district attorney's general fund of the Third Judicial District, or by paying an
amount equal to one hundred percent of the premium for a current employee of the
office of the district attorney, as the retiree chooses, for any district attorney or
assistant district attorney who retired with at least twenty-four years of full-time
service, regardless of age.
B. When the retired district attorney or assistant district attorney reaches the
age or condition for Medicare eligibility, the retired district attorney or assistant
district attorney shall secure Medicare and pursue a supplemental plan. The office
of the district attorney shall continue to pay the retired district attorney's or assistant
district attorney's current health insurance premium or the premium for the
supplemental plan that is comparable to the present insurance coverage.
C. As used in this Section, "years of full-time service" means the number of
years of creditable service that the retiree had in the District Attorneys' Retirement
System, as an assistant district attorney or an elected district attorney.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 89 ENROLLED
§694. Group health insurance; Thirtieth Judicial District; office of the district
attorney; eligible retired employees
A. The premium costs of group health insurance shall be paid in full from
the district attorney's general fund of the Thirtieth Judicial District, or by paying an
amount equal to one hundred percent of the premium for a current employee of the
office of the district attorney, as the retiree chooses, for any district attorney or
assistant district attorney who retired with at least twenty-four years of full-time
service, regardless of age.
B. When the retired district attorney or assistant district attorney reaches the
age or condition for Medicare eligibility, the retired district attorney or assistant
district attorney shall secure Medicare and pursue a supplemental plan. The office
of the district attorney shall continue to pay the retired district attorney's or assistant
district attorney's current health insurance premium or the premium for the
supplemental plan that is comparable to the present insurance coverage.
C. As used in this Section, "years of full-time service" means the number of
years of creditable service that the retiree had in the District Attorneys' Retirement
System, as an assistant district attorney or an elected district attorney.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act apply prospectively only to those district
attorneys or assistant district attorneys who retire on and after the effective date of this Act.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.